Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.362

Postadoption notice.

Either before or within two hundred days after the effective date of an adopted rule that imposes additional requirements on businesses the violation of which subjects the business to a penalty, assessment, or administrative sanction, an agency identified in RCW 34.05.220(6) shall notify businesses affected by the rule of the requirements of the rule and how to obtain technical assistance to comply. Notification must be provided by email, if possible, to every person identified to receive the postadoption notice under RCW 34.05.220(6).

The notification must announce the rule change, briefly summarize the rule change, refer to appeal procedures under RCW 34.05.330, and include a contact for more information. Failure to notify a specific business under this section does not invalidate a rule or waive the requirement to comply with the rule. The requirements of this section do not apply to emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350.

[ 2003 c 246 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2003 c 246: "The legislature finds that many businesses in the state are frustrated by the complexity of the regulatory system. The Washington Administrative Code containing agency rules now fills twelve volumes, and appears to be growing each year. While the vast majority of businesses make a good faith attempt to comply with applicable laws and rules, many find it extremely difficult to keep up with agencies' issuance of new rules and requirements. Therefore, state agencies are directed to make a good faith attempt to notify businesses affected by rule changes that may subject noncomplying businesses to penalties." [ 2003 c 246 s 1.]